nb: Form på mandolinens bakside: Archtop; Bowl-back; Flat-back; Annet
bg-BG: Форма на гърба на мандолината: Дъговиден връх; Куполен гръб; Плосък гръб; Други
cs: Tvar zadní desky mandolíny: Gibsonka; S klenutými zády; S rovnými zády; Jiné
it: Forma del dorso del mandolino: Archtop; Bowl-back; Schiena piatta; Altro
de: Rückenform der Mandoline: Archtop; Schüssel-Rückseite; Flache Decke; Sonstiges
ru: Форма задней части мандолины: Изогнутый верх; Чашеобразная; Плоская; Другое
hr-HR: Oblik stražnjeg dijela mandoline: Archtop; Bowl-back; Flat-back; Ostalo
pt-PT: Modelo do bandolim: Topo em arco; Fundo da taça; Parte traseira plana; Outro
vi: Hình dạng mặt sau đàn măng cầm: Lưng cong nhẹ; Lưng cong; Lưng phẳng; Khác
fr: Forme du dos de la mandoline: Archtop; Dos rond; Dos plat; Autre
sv: Mandolinens ryggform: Archtop; Bowlback; Flatback; Övrigt
zh-CN: 曼陀林背板形状: 圆背; 碗背; 平背; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do fundo do bandolim: Arqueado; Arredondado; Plano; Outro
en: Mandolin back shape: Archtop; Bowl-back; Flat-back; Other
fi: Mandoliinin selkäpuolen muoto: Archtop; Bowl-back; Flat-back; Muu
tr: Mandolin sırt şekli: Üstü oyulmuş; Yuvarlak sırtlı; Düz sırtlı; Diğer
sk-SK: Tvar chrbta mandolíny: Archtop; Bowl-back; Flat-back; Iné
ro-RO: Forma spatelui mandolinei: Cu arcadă arcuită; Cu spate bombat; Cu spate plat; Altele
lt-LT: Mandolinos nugarėlės forma: Archtop; Išgaubta nugara; Plokščia nugara; Kita
th: ทรงด้านหลังแมนโดลิน: อาร์ชท็อป; โบว์ลแบ็ค; หลังแบน; อื่นๆ
hu: Mandolin hátának formája: Archtop; Öblös; Lapos; Egyéb
ko: 만돌린 뒷면 형태: 아치탑; 보울백; 플랫백; 기타
sl-SI: Oblika zadnjega dela mandoline: Archtop; Akustična; Z ravnim hrbtom; Drugo
da: Form på bagsiden af en mandolin: Hulkrop; Hvælvet bund; Flad bund; Andet
es: Forma del respaldo de la mandolina: Arco superior; Respaldo en forma de cuenco; Respaldo plano; Otros
nl: Mandoline achterkant: Archtop; Bowlback; Flatback; Andere
pl: Kształt tyłu mandoliny: Archtop; Bowl-back; Płaski tył; Inne
el: Σχήμα πλάτης μαντολίνου: Αψιδωτό; Με καμπύλο πίσω; Επίπεδο πίσω; Άλλο
zh-TW: 曼陀林背部形狀: 拱頂; 拱背; 平背; 其他
ja: マンドリンの裏板形状: アーチトップ; ボウルバック; フラットバック; その他